Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0076.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1308c. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the governing body of a public school or nonpublic school shall implement a mobile panic alert system for use in a school security emergency using the funds under section 97n of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1697n. A mobile panic alert system implemented under this subsection must meet both of the following requirements: (a) Be capable of connecting local law enforcement and state law enforcement, school faculty and staff, and first responder agencies to ensure real-time coordination between 9-1-1 and other first responder agencies. (b) Directly integrate with local public safety answering point infrastructure to transmit 9-1-1 calls through landline activations and mobile activations, including mobile applications and standard mobile calls, with continued 2-way direct communication between 9-1-1 public safety answering points and schools. (2) Subject to section 261 of the management and budget act, MCL 18.1261, the department of technology, management, and budget shall utilize competitive solicitation to procure a mobile panic alert system for use by each public school and nonpublic school. The department of technology, management, and budget shall consult with the department, the office of school safety within the department of state police, and the emergency management and homeland security division of the department of state police in the procurement of a mobile panic alert system or the development of the competitive solicitation for the mobile panic alert system under this section. To be eligible to enter into a contract for the mobile panic alert system under this section, a vendor must have deployed a mobile panic button program on a statewide basis and be certified by the Department of Homeland Security under the SAFETY act, Public Law 107-296. (3) The governing body of a public school or nonpublic school is not required to implement a mobile panic alert system as required under subsection (1) if the public school or nonpublic school has a panic alert system already in place that meets the requirements of subsection (1) and has received an exemption under this subsection. To receive an exemption, the governing body of the public school or nonpublic school must submit a petition to the department requesting an exemption from the requirements in subsection (1). On receipt of an exemption petition under this subsection, the department shall consult with the office of school safety within the department of state police and the emergency management and homeland security division of the department of state police during its evaluation of the exemption petition. The department shall determine whether the panic alert system already in place in that public school or nonpublic school meets the requirements of subsection (1). If the department determines that the system meets the requirements of subsection (1), the department shall issue an exemption to the public school or nonpublic school. If the department determines that the system does not meet the requirements of subsection (1), the department shall issue a denial of the exemption petition and the reasons for that denial to the public school or nonpublic school. (4) If a public school or nonpublic school fails to comply with subsection (1) or receive an exemption under subsection (3), the department of state police may determine that the public school or nonpublic school is ineligible to receive any school safety grants from the department of state police for the fiscal year in which the noncompliance is discovered by the department of state police. (5) As used in this section: (a) "First responder agency" means an agency created by 1 or more local units of government, that consists of law enforcement officers, firefighters, or members of a rescue squad or ambulance crew. First responder agency includes a 9-1-1 public safety answering point. (b) "Local law enforcement" means a law enforcement agency that employs peace officers on behalf of a local unit of government. (c) "School security emergency" includes, but is not limited to, a nonfire evacuation, a lockdown, or an active-shooter situation. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 77 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.